Washington statutes.
RCW 21.30.270

Multiple licenses, when permitted.

No person may at any one time act as a commodity sales representative for more than one commodity broker-dealer or one issuer, except (1) where the commodity broker-dealers for whom the commodity sales representative will act are affiliated by direct or indirect common control, a commodity sales representative may represent each of those organizations or (2) where the administrator, by rule or order, authorizes multiple licenses as consistent with the public interest and protection of investors.

[ 1986 c 14 s 28.]